Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 10. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 32.06.955.
Knowledge and notice.

A person knows a fact if the person has actual knowledge of it.

A person has notice of a fact if the person

knows of it;

has received a notification of it; or

has reason to know it exists from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question.

A person notifies or gives a notification to another person by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in the ordinary course of business, whether or not the other person learns of it.

A person receives a notification when the notification

comes to the person’s attention; or

is duly delivered at the person’s place of business or at any other place held out by the person as a place for receiving communications.

Except as otherwise provided in (f) of this section, a person other than an individual knows, has notice, or receives a notification of a fact for purposes of a particular transaction when the individual conducting the transaction knows, has notice of, or receives a notification of the fact, or in any event when the fact would have been brought to the individual’s attention if the person had exercised reasonable diligence. The person exercises reasonable diligence if the person maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the individual conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence does not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

A partner’s knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the partnership is effective immediately as knowledge by, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.960.
Effect of partnership agreement; nonwaivable provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, relations between and among the partners and between the partners and the partnership are governed by the partnership agreement. To the extent the partnership agreement does not otherwise provide, this chapter governs relations between and among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

The partnership agreement may not

vary the rights and duties under AS

32.06.970

except to eliminate the duty to provide copies of statements to all of the partners;

unreasonably restrict the right of access to records under AS

32.06.403(b)

;

eliminate the duty of loyalty under AS

32.06.404(b)

or

32.06.603(b)(3)

, but

the partnership agreement may identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty, if not manifestly unreasonable; or

all of the partners or a number or percentage specified in the partnership agreement may authorize or ratify, after full disclosure of all material facts, a specific act or transaction that otherwise would violate the duty of loyalty;

unreasonably reduce the duty of care under AS

32.06.404(c)

or

32.06.603(b)(3)

;

eliminate the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under AS

32.06.404(d)

, but the partnership agreement may prescribe the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured, if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable;

vary the power to dissociate as a partner under AS

32.06.602(a)

, except to require the notice under AS

32.06.601

(1) to be in writing;

vary the right of a court to expel a partner in the events specified in AS

32.06.601

(5);

vary the requirement to wind up the partnership business in cases under AS

32.06.801

(4), (5), or (6);

vary the law applicable to a limited liability partnership under AS

32.06.975(b)

; or

restrict rights of third parties under this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.965.
Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

If an obligation to pay interest arises under this chapter and the rate is not specified, the rate is governed by AS

45.45.010

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.970.
Execution, filing, recording, amendment, and cancellation of statements.

A statement may be filed with the department. A certified copy of a statement that is filed in an office in another state may be filed with the department. Either filing has the effect provided in this chapter with respect to partnership property located in or transactions that occur in this state.

A certified copy of a statement that has been filed with the department and recorded in the office for recording transfers of real property has the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter. A recorded statement that is not a certified copy of a statement filed with the department does not have the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter.

A statement filed by a partnership must be executed by at least two partners. Other statements must be executed by a partner or other person authorized by this chapter. An individual who executes a statement as, or on behalf of, a partner or other person named as a partner in a statement shall personally declare under penalty of perjury that the contents of the statement are accurate.

A person authorized by this chapter to file a statement may amend or cancel the statement by filing an amendment or cancellation that names the partnership, identifies the statement, and states the substance of the amendment or cancellation.

A person who files a statement under this section shall promptly send a copy of the statement to every nonfiling partner and to any other person named as a partner in the statement. Failure to send a copy of a statement to a partner or other person does not limit the effectiveness of the statement as to a person who is not a partner.

The department may collect a fee for filing or providing a certified copy of a statement.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 32.06.975.
Governing law.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, the law of the jurisdiction where a partnership has its chief executive office governs the relations between and among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

The law of this state governs relations between and among the partners and between the partners and the partnership and the liability of partners for an obligation of a limited liability partnership.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.985.
Partnership subject to amendment or repeal of chapter.

A partnership governed by this chapter is subject to an amendment or repeal of this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)